North Dakota, session 69, SB2389.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - CHILD CARE INFRASTRUCTURE.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying the
current child care infrastructure in the state to identify strengths, challenges, and
opportunities for improved public policy, accountability, and investment. The study
must:
a. Review data regarding the availability and affordability of child care in each
county.
b. Examine the various public funds used to support child care facilities directly,
including child care assistance reimbursement levels and penetration rates by
county and facility, other grant programs, and enhanced reimbursements for
employees with specialized training, to recommend options for improvement.
c. Examine the child care licensing and registration policies and procedures to
consider improvements and opportunities to simplify the process.
2. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together
with any legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth
legislative assembly.
Page No. 1 25.1371.01000